District of Columbia statutes.
32-1331.15

Workplace Fraud Fund.

There is established as a nonlapsing fund the Workplace Fraud Fund (“Fund”). Each civil penalty collected pursuant to this subchapter shall be paid into the Fund to partially offset the administration, investigation, and other expenses incurred in implementing this subchapter. All funds deposited into the Fund, and any interest earned on those funds, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of the fiscal year, or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the administration of this subchapter without regard to fiscal year limitation, subject to authorization of Congress.

Aug. 3, 1956, 70 Stat. 976, ch. 924, § 215
as added Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-300, § 2(b), 60 DCR 2679
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-300 added this section.